Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.150

Identification of schools with highest growth in English language learner students—Cultural competence professional development and training.

At the beginning of each school year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify schools in the top five percent of schools with the highest percent growth during the previous two school years in enrollment of English language learner students as compared to previous enrollment trends. The office shall notify the identified schools, and the school districts in which the schools are located are strongly encouraged to provide the cultural competence professional development and training developed under RCW 28A.405.106, 28A.405.120, and * 28A.415.420 for classified, certificated instructional, and administrative staff of the schools. The professional development and training may be delivered by an educational service district, through district in-service, or by another qualified provider, including in partnership with the local community.

[ 2016 c 72 s 402.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.415.420 was repealed by 2021 c 197 s 14.

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.